Maine, session 132, LD1788.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §402, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Commercial request. "Commercial request" means a request of a public record
pursuant to this chapter that asks for information for a use or purpose that furthers a
commercial, trade or profit interest, which can include furthering those interests through
litigation. An agency or official's decision to place a requester in the commercial request
category is made on a case-by-case basis based on the requester's intended use.
Sec. 2. 1 MRSA §402, sub-§1-C is enacted to read:
1-C. Educational institution. "Educational institution" means a school that operates
a program of scholarly research.
Sec. 3. 1 MRSA §402, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Noncommercial request. "Noncommercial request" means a request of a public
record pursuant to this chapter made by an educational institution, noncommercial
scientific institution or a representative of the news media or by another person that asks
for information, for a use or purpose that is not determined to be a commercial request, on
a case-by-case basis.
Sec. 4. 1 MRSA §402, sub-§2-B is enacted to read:
2-B. Noncommercial scientific institution. "Noncommercial scientific institution"
means an institution that is not operated on a commercial basis and that is operated solely
for the purpose of conducting scientific research, the results of which are not intended to
promote any particular product or industry.
Sec. 5. 1 MRSA §402, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Representative of news media. "Representative of the news media" means a
person or entity that actively gathers information of potential interest to a segment of the
public, uses its editorial skills to turn the raw materials into a distinct work about a current
event or that would be of current interest to the public and distributes that work to an
audience. "Representative of news media" includes, but is not limited to, television or radio
stations that broadcast news to the public at large and publishers of periodicals that
disseminate news through a variety of means to the general public, including news
organizations that disseminate solely or in part on the Internet.
Sec. 6. 1 MRSA §408-A, sub-§8, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 375, §1, is further
amended to read:
B. The agency or official may charge a fee to cover the actual cost of searching for,
retrieving and compiling the requested public record in accordance with this paragraph.
Compiling the public record includes reviewing and redacting confidential
information.
(1) The agency or official may not charge a fee for the first 2 hours of staff time
per noncommercial request.
(2) After the first 2 hours of staff time per noncommercial request, the agency or
official may charge a fee of not more than $25 per hour.
Page 1 - 132LR1171(01)

(3) The agency or official may establish a fee structure and charge a fee for a
commercial request.
Sec. 7. 1 MRSA §408-A, sub-§13 is enacted to read:
13. Certification of use of request. A person or entity must certify whether a request
made pursuant to this section is a commercial request or a noncommercial request and
whether the public information subject to the request is likely to be produced pursuant to
an ongoing judicial proceeding and provide additional information, as necessary, to the
agency or official having custody or control of a public record subject to a request under
this section, on a form to be developed by the agency or official.